California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(b) A certified California veteran service provider shall provide to the department all of the following up-to-date documents upon application for certification and at any time during the certification period on request and reasonable notice by the department:

(1) Articles of incorporation and all amendments to the articles of incorporation.

(2) IRS Letter of Determination.

(3) Taxpayer
 identification number.

(4) Independent audit reports dating back three years.

(c) (1) In order to obtain certification as a certified California veteran service provider, the applicant shall apply to the department, in a form and manner as required by the department.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2019, the department shall begin processing and approving or rejecting all applications for certification on the basis of the requirements set forth in subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall maintain a list of certified California veteran service providers on its Internet Web site, including the type of supportive services provided by the providers.

(e) On or before April 1, 2019, the department shall provide the Senate and Assembly Committees on Veterans Affairs with a progress report on the status of the regulations required by subdivision (b) of Section 883.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 1618)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

For purposes of certification, the department may accept current certifications and licenses from any other state entity, agency, or department as supporting evidence of the applicant’s qualifications under the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 881.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 1618)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

(a) (1) A certification approved by the department shall be valid for three years from the date the department accepts credentials for certification unless the department decertifies the certified California veteran service provider.

(2) Certification by the department may be used by other departments or state agencies for any other appropriate purpose.

(b) No later than July 1, 2019, the department shall adopt rules, procedures, and regulations as necessary to certify a veteran service provider, and to decertify a certified California veteran service provider prior to the expiration of a
 current certification when the certified California veteran service provider no longer meets the requirements set forth in Section 881.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 1618)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

885.

(a) The department shall establish the Veteran’s Military Discharge Upgrade Grant Program to help fund service providers who, for free or at low cost, will educate veterans about discharge upgrades and assist qualifying veterans in filing discharge upgrade applications.

(b) The department shall develop criteria, procedures, and accountability measures as may be necessary to implement the grant program. The department may prioritize veteran recipients of the services, such as prioritizing those who are able to demonstrate their less than honorable characterization of service was connected to a mental health condition, traumatic brain injury, sexual assault or harassment, or sexual orientation.

(c) Funding for the grant program is subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (AB 325)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Educational Assistance [890. - 899.]



  ARTICLE 2. Veterans’ Dependents [890. - 899.]

890.

As used in this article:

(a) “Veterans” means (1) any person who served in the Army, Navy, or Marine Corps of the United States and was killed in action or died as a result of war service in the World War since April 6, 1917; (2) any member of the Army, Navy, Coast Guard or Marine Corps of the United States, or any of their auxiliaries, including, but not limited to, the Philippine Commonwealth Army, the Regular Scouts (“Old Scouts”), and the Special Philippine Scouts (“New Scouts”), who was killed in action in World War II on or after December 7, 1941, and prior to January 1, 1947, or who died at any time as a result of war service during such period; (3) any member of the armed forces of the United States who was killed in action during any period of hostilities in which the United States is engaged, or who died or was totally disabled at any time as a result of active service during any such period or during the induction period; or (4) any person who, at the time of entry into the armed forces of the United States was a resident of this state and was subsequently declared by the United States government to be missing in action, captured in the line of duty by hostile forces, or forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by a foreign government or power.

(b) “Dependent of a veteran” means the natural or adopted child of a veteran, or stepchild of a veteran as defined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for compensation purposes, the unmarried surviving spouse of a veteran, or the spouse of a totally disabled veteran.

(c) “Induction period” means (1) the period beginning September 16, 1940, and ending December 6, 1941, and the period beginning January 1, 1947, and ending June 26, 1950, and (2) the period beginning on February 1, 1955, and ending on the day before the first day thereafter on which individuals (other than individuals liable for induction by reason of a prior deferment) are no longer liable for induction for training and service into the armed forces under the Universal Military Training and Service Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

890.3.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after January 1, 2001, a claimant is not ineligible for a disabled veterans’ benefit for lack of certification of disability of the veteran with respect to whom the benefit is sought, if there is a currently pending application to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs (USDVA) for certification of disability for that veteran and the subsequently received certification qualifies the veteran for the benefit. An entity of state government, or any political subdivision thereof, to which a claim for a disabled veterans’ benefit is made, shall require the claimant to provide written verification that an application had been pending with the USDVA at the time the claim for the
 disabled veterans’ benefit is submitted.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “disabled veterans benefit” means an exemption, privilege, service, or other legal benefit that is provided pursuant to law by the state, or a political subdivision thereof, exclusively to a disabled veteran, or their surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, parent, or child.

(b) (1) For purposes of applying the disabled veterans’ property tax exemption set forth in Section 205.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any amount of tax, including any interest or penalty thereon, levied upon that portion of the assessed value of real property that would have been exempt if the veteran’s pending application
 for certification of disability had been finalized, shall be canceled or refunded if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The certification is received and is forwarded to the county assessor.

(B) A return is made as required by Section 277 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Any refund issued pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the limitations periods for refunds set forth in Section 5097 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 69.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

(a) A dependent of a veteran applying for aid under this article shall be over 14 years of age or shall have entered the ninth grade, and shall be a native of or shall have lived in this state for five of the nine years immediately preceding the date that the application is filed.

(b) Any dependent of a veteran who has attained eligibility pursuant to this article while under 21 years of age may continue to receive the benefits of this article until the needed training is completed or until they attain 27 years of age, whatever first occurs.

(c) The eligibility limitations of subdivision
 (b) shall not apply to the spouse or dependent surviving spouse or domestic partner of a veteran. However, the spouse or dependent surviving spouse or domestic partner of a veteran shall be limited to not more than 48 months, of full-time training, or the equivalent thereof in part-time training.

(d) Notwithstanding the eligibility limitations of subdivision (b), a dependent who has honorably served in the Armed Forces of the United States may be granted an extension of training through 30 years of age.

(e) The eligibility limitations of subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to the dependent of a veteran as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 890.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 70.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

A dependent of a veteran who desires to continue his education may apply to the department. If in the opinion of the department the educational needs of the applicant can be satisfactorily met in educational institutions in this State or elsewhere, the department shall assume state wardship over the education of the applicant. The department may provide educational counsel for applicants and assist them in securing admission to suitable institutions of learning. Tuition may be paid at private schools only when suitable opportunity is not available in public or semipublic institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

893.

The department, insofar as funds permit, may provide:

(a) For the payment of tuition and other fees.

(b) For the monthly payment of an allowance for books, supplies and living expenses of the student. Qualified applicants may claim their first monthly allowance upon completion of school registration and the department is authorized to establish a revolving fund if necessary to expedite payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

894.

For students of collegiate, community college, business and trade school rank, the amount expended by the department as an allowance for living expenses shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per month. Dependents enrolled in the fifth year of any course requiring five years may be considered to be at the undergraduate level. For students of high school rank, the amount shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) per month during the time the student is in actual attendance at a day school. Absence during the month on account of illness shall be included as attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

895.

For tuition and fees:

(a) The amount expended on account of any one applicant of undergraduate, collegiate, community college, business, or trade school rank under this article shall not exceed the maximum rate authorized for the regular school year under Section 69566 of the Education Code and not to exceed one-third more for students pursuing a summer session or full year course.

(b) For students of high school rank, the sum shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450) a year for students pursuing a regular course and five hundred fifty dollars ($550) a year for students pursuing a summer session or full year course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 44, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

896.

The department shall consider applications in the order in which they are received. If the funds available are insufficient to meet the obligations which would arise from the guardianship of all worthy applicants, the department shall assume wardship over the applicants who are most urgently in need of further education, taking into consideration both scholastic achievement and financial need.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------

896.1.

No dependent of a veteran, as defined in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 890, shall be eligible to receive the benefits of this article during the time that he is entitled to receive federal educational benefits under Chapter 35, Title 38, United States Code, as amended, or duplicate assistance from any other government source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

896.3.

Upon application to the department by a dependent of a veteran as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 890, the department shall reimburse such person for the costs of tuition and fees incurred by such person at a public or private educational institution in the amount provided for in Section 895.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

896.4.

Any person who is reimbursed by the department for tuition and fees or on whose account the department has paid tuition and fees, shall not at the same time be eligible for any other allowances provided for in this article if, at such time, such person is also therefor entitled to receive educational assistance under Chapter 35, Title 38, United States Code, as amended, or duplicate assistance from any other government source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

898.

The sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) is hereby annually appropriated from the receipts heretofore or hereafter collected under the provisions of Chapter 5, Statutes of 1938, or any other act under which oil royalties are or may be collected, other than those receipts received from rents, bonuses, and royalties accruing from the use of state school land, to carry out the purposes of this article. Such amount shall annually be paid into the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1744.)
-------------------------------------------

899.

The department may, for the purposes of this article, draw upon its appropriation for educational assistance to veterans under Section 981 to 981.8 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1031.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Local Aid [920. - 975.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Indigent Veterans [920. - 931.]

920.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise indicates, “veteran” means a person who has been honorably discharged from the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States Coast Guard, United States Space Force, the Merchant Marine, or the American Red Cross, and who has served in any war.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 16.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

921.

The board of supervisors of any county may grant financial assistance, relief, and support to indigent veterans. Such assistance, relief, and support shall be administered through and by any military, naval, or marine organization created for the purpose of aiding, relieving and supporting such veterans under the terms and conditions set forth in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

Any organization desiring to assist indigent veterans shall first file with the board of supervisors of the county in which it is operating or intending to operate, a verified statement setting forth the following:

(a) Name, objects, and purposes of the organization. One of the purposes shall be that mentioned in section 921.

(b) Date of organization.

(c) Names and addresses of officers and relief committee.

(d) Name and address of the treasurer or financial officer in charge of the receipt and disbursement of funds.

(e) Number of members.

(f) Financial condition, showing total assets and liabilities.

(g) That financial assistance for indigent veterans to be administered in accordance with the provisions of this article will be requested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

923.

Upon the filing of the statement the board of supervisors shall set a day for its consideration not more than ten days after the date of filing. At least five days’ notice of the hearing shall be given by mail to the clerk or secretary of the organization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

924.

On the day set, the board of supervisors shall, after hearing any evidence presented, determine by resolution entered upon its minutes whether the organization is qualified to carry out this article. The resolution shall be effective for a period of one year only and may be revoked at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

925.

(a) No money shall be transferred to any person under this article except to the treasurer or financial officer whose name is given in the statement required by Section 922.

(b) The treasurer or financial officer shall, before receiving any money hereunder, file with the board of supervisors a bond or undertaking in an amount fixed by the board of supervisors. The bond shall inure to the benefit of the county and shall be conditioned upon the faithful and honest administration of the funds intrusted to the officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 314.)
-------------------------------------------

926.

Upon receipt of a request from any organization qualified under this article, giving the names of all indigent veterans for whom relief is desired, together with the branch of service, division, regiment, and company, or other unit or designation by which each of such veterans may be identified, and a further statement that the circumstances of each of such veterans has been personally investigated by the relief committee of the organization, and that each is in all respects worthy and entitled to relief hereunder, the board of supervisors may direct the county auditor to draw his warrant upon the county treasurer for the amount specified in the request, or a lesser amount. Such warrant shall be delivered to the treasurer or financial officer of the organization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

927.

All money paid out by any county under this article shall be used by the organization receiving it exclusively for the relief of indigent veterans and no part of it shall ever be used for administration or overhead expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

928.

The indigent and dependent surviving spouse or domestic partner, minor child, father, or mother of any indigent veteran may be granted relief by the organization out of the money available under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 71.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

929.

The necessary expenses, not to exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350), for burial or cremation of any indigent veteran may be paid out of the money available under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

930.

The money necessary to carry out this article may be taken from the general fund of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 380, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

931.

Any municipal corporation may extend assistance to any organization under this article. In such case all proceedings required to be had before the board of supervisors of the county shall be had before the legislative body of the city. The words “board of supervisors,” “county,” “county auditor” and “county treasurer” wherever used in this article shall mean “legislative body,” “city,” “city auditor” and “city treasurer.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Disabled Veterans [935. - 935.]

935.

The governing board of any county may grant financial assistance, relief, and support to a disabled veteran, as defined in Section 999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 113.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Burial of Veterans and Veterans’ Dependents [940. - 955.]

940.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise indicates, “veteran” means a person honorably discharged from the armed forces of the United States, including, but not limited to, the Philippine Commonwealth Army, the Regular Scouts (“Old Scouts”), and the Special Philippine Scouts (“New Scouts”).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 768, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

940.5.

As used in this article, the terms “burial” and “interment” include cremation, except that the election of the form of interment as between burial and cremation shall be made pursuant to the first paragraph of Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 134, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

941.

This article shall not apply to soldiers, sailors, or marines who die in the national or State soldiers’ homes in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

942.

The board of supervisors of each county shall designate an honorably discharged veteran of the United States military or a member of a veterans’ remains organization, as defined in Section 951, who shall cause to be decently interred the body of any veteran or spouse or eligible dependent of a veteran as defined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for compensation purposes who dies in the county. This section shall apply to all indigent, abandoned, or unclaimed veterans and dependents of veterans, including those deceased veterans and dependents of veterans without sufficient means to defray the expenses of burial, other than moneys paid or due and payable by the United States, pursuant to the World War Adjusted Compensation
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (AB 1644)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

943.

Such burial shall not be made in any cemetery or burial ground, or any portion thereof, used exclusively for the burial of the pauper dead.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

944.

When a deceased veteran or a surviving spouse or domestic partner of a veteran has been interred other than by the person designated by the board of supervisors, the person so designated may pay the sum of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) toward the burial expenses of the person who would have been entitled to interment by the person designated by the supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 72.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

945.

The expenses to the county of each burial or contribution shall not exceed the sum of three hundred fifty dollars ($350). Claims therefor are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 380, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

946.

Such claims shall be paid by the county in which the veteran or surviving spouse or domestic partner dies. If the decedent was a resident of any other county than the one paying the claim, the county of the decedent’s residence shall refund the money advanced by the county where the person died. Such claims shall be audited and paid by the county as other accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 73.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

947.

The person appointed under section 942, before he assumes the charge and expenses of any burial, shall first satisfy himself by a careful inquiry into and examination of all the circumstances in the case that the family of the decedent, if any, residing in the county, is unable for want of means to defray the expenses of the burial. If he finds such inability he shall cause the decedent to be buried as provided in this article. He shall immediately report his action to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county, stating all the facts and that he found the family of the decedent in indigent circumstances and unable to pay the expenses of the burial. He shall also report the name, rank, and command of the veteran, the date of death, place of burial, occupation, and an itemized statement of the expenses of such burial.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

948.

The clerk of the board of supervisors, upon receiving the report and statement of expenses, shall transcribe in a book kept for that purpose all the facts contained in the report respecting such decedent. The clerk, upon the burial of any honorably discharged soldier, sailor, or marine, shall make application to the proper authorities of the United States, for a suitable headstone, as provided by act of Congress, and cause the same to be placed at the head of the grave of such soldier, sailor, or marine. The expenses shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) for cartage and properly setting each stone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

949.

The board of supervisors shall perpetually maintain the grave of any such honorably discharged soldier, sailor, or marine. The expenses thus incurred shall be audited and paid as provided in section 946 for burial expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

950.

The person appointed under section 942 shall receive no compensation for any duties he may perform in compliance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

951.

(a) “Veteran status information” means the data required by the Department of Veterans Affairs to verify the status of a decedent as either a veteran or the dependent of a veteran for purposes of eligibility for burial in a national or state cemetery, including the person’s name, service number, social security number, date of birth, date of death, place of birth, branch of the service, and military rank.

(b) “Veterans’ remains organization” means any entity recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the National Personnel Records
 Center as an organization authorized to verify and inter unclaimed cremated remains of American veterans, including a member or employee of that entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 3.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

951.5.

The public administrator of the county shall make every reasonable effort to determine if the unclaimed remains of a decedent referred to the public administrator belong to a veteran or the dependent of a veteran. If there is reason to believe that the remains belong to a veteran or the dependent of a veteran, the public administrator shall work with the county veteran service officer, a national veterans cemetery, the United States Social Security Administration, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or other applicable entity to determine if the remains belong to a veteran or the dependent of a veteran.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 722, Sec. 2.   (AB 1806)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

952.

(a) A cemetery corporation or association, or other entity in possession of the cremated remains of a veteran or dependent of a veteran, shall, upon request of a veterans’ remains organization and after verifying the status of the veterans’ remains organization as an organization currently authorized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the National Personnel Records Center or as an organization authorized by the local county board of supervisors to verify and inter unclaimed cremated remains of American veterans, release veteran status information to the veterans’ remains organization.

(b) The use or disclosure of veteran status information obtained by a veterans’ remains organization pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall be permitted only for the purpose of verifying veteran interment benefits of the deceased veteran or a dependent of a veteran with the California Department of Veterans Affairs and shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose.

(c) The cemetery authority, cemetery corporation or association, or other entity in possession of the cremated remains of a veteran or dependent of a veteran may, upon request of a veterans’ remains organization and after verifying the status of the veterans’ remains organization as an organization currently authorized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the National Personnel Records Center or as an organization authorized by the local county board of supervisors to verify and inter unclaimed cremated remains of American veterans, release the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran to a veterans’ remains organization for the sole purpose of interment,
 subject to Section 943 of this code and Sections 7110 and 7208 of the Health and Safety Code, when all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The veterans’ remains organization has verified the interment benefits of the deceased veteran or dependent of a veteran with the California Department of Veterans Affairs and provided documentation of the verification to the cemetery authority, cemetery corporation or association, or other entity that the decedent is a veteran or a dependent of a veteran eligible for burial in a national or state cemetery.

(2) The veterans’ remains organization has made a reasonable effort to locate the agent or family member who has the right to control the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran.

(3) The veterans’ remains organization has provided notice to all
 known agents or family members who have the right to control the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran of the veteran’s remains organization’s intent to claim the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran for the purpose of providing a proper burial of the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran in accordance with Section 943 of this code and Sections 7110 and 7208 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) An agent or family member who has the right to control the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran has made no attempt to claim the cremated remains.

(5) The cremated remains have been in the possession of the cemetery authority, cemetery corporation or association, or other entity for a period of at least one year.

(d) The cemetery authority,
 cemetery corporation or association, or other entity that releases veteran status information or cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran pursuant to this section shall not be subject to civil liability, except for gross negligence, if all of the conditions of this section are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 114.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

953.

(a) A veterans’ remains organization shall take all reasonable steps to inter the cremated remains of a veteran or dependent of a veteran received in accordance with this article.

(b) A veterans’ remains organization that receives and inters the cremated remains of a veteran or dependent of a veteran pursuant to this article shall not be liable for negligence if the veterans’ remains organization does not know or have reason to know that the cremated remains of the veteran or dependent of a veteran were not released by the cemetery authority, cemetery corporation or association, or other entity in compliance with subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 952.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 189, Sec. 5.   (AB 1644)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

954.

The board of supervisors of each county is encouraged to designate personnel from a veterans’ remains organization, as defined in Section 951, to fulfill the role created in Section 942.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 189, Sec. 6.   (AB 1644)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

955.

(a) (1) A county veteran service officer that determines, pursuant to Section 951.5, that unclaimed remains are those of a veteran or dependent of a veteran, and that the remains meet the criteria for interment by a veterans’ remains organization pursuant to Section 952, shall report the following information to the Department of Veterans Affairs:

(A) The name, rank, and branch of service of the deceased or, if the deceased is the dependent of a veteran, the name of the deceased and the name, rank, and branch of service of the eligible veteran.

(B) Dates of service.

(C) Location of the remains and a telephone number and name for the contact at that location.

(2) If, pursuant to Section 951.5, the public administrator of a county determines, without the involvement of the county veteran service officer, that the remains belong to a veteran or dependent of a veteran, the public administrator shall report this information to the county veteran service officer. Following this report, the county veteran service officer shall follow the reporting procedures described in paragraph (1).

(b) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall create and maintain a list of veterans and dependents of veterans whose remains are reported pursuant to subdivision (a). This list shall be available to the representatives of veterans’ remains organizations by telephone or in person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 722, Sec. 3.   (AB 1806)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Care of Veterans’ Graves [960. - 962.]

960.

Whenever in any cemetery or place of burial of human remains, which is established or organized under the authority of the board of supervisors of any county or the governing body of any city, there is any known grave of a former soldier, sailor, or marine of the United States who was not dishonorably discharged from the service, the officers who manage such cemetery or place of burial shall keep such grave properly marked and identified, and free from weeds and rubbish, and keep in decent order and repair and free from defacement, injury, and unlawful markings any tomb, monument, gravestone, wall, or other appurtenance to such grave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

960.5.

Whenever in any cemetery or place of burial of human remains there is any known grave of a former soldier, sailor, or marine of the United States who was not dishonorably discharged from the service, the board of supervisors of any county as to territory, whether incorporated or not, within it, and the governing body of the city as to territory within it, with the consent of the officers who manage such cemetery or place of burial, if any may keep such grave properly marked and identified, and free from weeds and rubbish, and keep in decent order and repair and free from defacement, injury, and unlawful markings any tomb, monument, gravestone, wall, or other appurtenance to such grave.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1867.)
-------------------------------------------

961.

Any fraternal or benevolent organization which maintains a plot in a place of burial mentioned in section 960, which is devoted exclusively to the burial of soldiers, sailors, or marines of the United States, may apply under this article to the board of supervisors of the county in which the plot is maintained. Upon a showing of need, the board may keep the plot free from weeds and rubbish, and keep in decent order and repair and free from defacement and injury any tomb, monument, gravestone, wall, or other appurtenance to the graves in the plot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

962.

The officers who are charged by law with raising money by taxation for maintaining any such cemetery or place of burial shall fix the tax levy at an amount sufficient to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [970. - 974.5.]

970.

(a) The board of supervisors of each county may, but is not required to, appoint, prescribe the qualifications of, and fix the compensation of an officer to be titled “county veterans service officer.” The appointee shall be a veteran.

(b) It shall be the duty of the county veterans service officer to administer the aid provided for in this chapter, to investigate all claims, applications, or requests for aid made pursuant to the terms of this chapter, and to perform any other veteran related services as requested by the county board of supervisors.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), two or
 more counties may jointly establish a single county veterans service office which shall serve all the counties that agree to the joint establishment of that office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 5.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

(a) The county veterans service officer shall assist every veteran of any war of the United States and every qualified former member, and the dependents of every deceased veteran and every qualified former member, in presenting and pursuing any claim the veteran or the qualified former member may have against the United States and in establishing the veteran’s or qualified former member’s right to any privilege, preference, care, or compensation provided for by the laws of the United States or of this state.

(b) The county veterans service officer shall present and pursue claims against the United States referred by any public agency
 pursuant to Section 721.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified former member” means any former member of the United States Armed Forces, who is eligible under federal law to receive any veterans benefit from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other agency of the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 6.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

(a) The board of supervisors may provide the county veterans service office with any assistance and facilities that it determines to be necessary.
